Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES PROGRAM 2025
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 16 of this 2024 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 682.
SECTION 2. (1) The Emergency Medical  Services Program is established within the
Oregon Health Authority for  the purpose of administering a comprehensive statewide emer-
gency medical services system developed by the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board
and focused on emergency medical services and time-sensitive emergencies. The  system in-
cludes:
(a) The development of state and regional standards of emergency medical care;
(b) The development of state, regional and interstate protocols for patient transfers using
emergency medical services;
(c) The training and licensing of emergency medical services providers;
(d) The development and management of emergency medical services data systems;
(e) The management and administration of state workforce, recruitment  and retention
programs related to emergency medical services;
(f) The regulation and administration of state reimbursement systems  for emergency
medical services; and
(g) Requirements for reporting out  measurable performance and equity indicators of
emergency medical services within this state.
(2) The program is administered by a director who:
(a) Is responsible for conducting emergency medical  services system oversight and im-
plementing the recommendations of the advisory board.
(b) Shall apply funds allocated to the program in the following order of priority:
(A) Development of state and regional standards of care;
(B) Strengthening the state’s emergency medical services workforce;
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 1
(C) Development of statewide educational curriculum to teach the standards of care;
(D) Implementation of quality improvement programs; and
(E) Support for and enhancement of the state’s emergency medical services.
(c) May adopt rules as  necessary to carry out the director’s duties and responsibilities
described in this subsection.
(3) The program shall have a State  EMS Medical Director who is the chairperson of the
Emergency Medical Services Advisory  Board established under section 4 of this 2024 Act and
who is responsible for:
(a) Providing specialized medical oversight in the development and administration of the
program;
(b) Implementing emergency medical services quality improvement measures;
(c) Undertaking research and providing public  education regarding emergency medical
services; and
(d) Serving as a liaison with emergency medical services agencies,  emergency medical
services centers, hospitals, state and national emergency medical services professional or-
ganizations and state and federal partners.
(4) The authority shall:
(a) Adopt rules to establish statewide  emergency medical services objectives and stand-
ards; and
(b) Publish a biennial report regarding the program’s activities.
(5)(a) The establishment of the program does not  affect the contracting authority of
counties and county ambulance service areas.
(b) The objectives and standards established under subsection (4) of this  section do not
prohibit a local jurisdiction from  implementing objectives and standards that are more rig-
orous than those established under subsection (4) of this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) The  Emergency Medical Services Program, with the advice of the
Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board, the Time-Sensitive Medical  Emergencies Advi-
sory Committee, the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee,  the Pediatric Emer-
gency Medical Services Advisory Committee and the Behavioral Health Emergency Medical
Services Advisory Committee, shall:
(a) Coordinate with national health organizations  involved in improving the quality of
stroke, cardiac, trauma, pediatric  and behavioral health care to avoid duplicative information
and redundant processes;
(b) Use information  related to stroke, cardiac, trauma, pediatric and behavioral health
care to support improvement in the quality of  care in accordance with guidelines that meet
or exceed nationally recognized standards;
(c) Encourage the sharing of information among health care  providers on practices that
improve the quality of stroke, cardiac, trauma, pediatric and behavioral health care;
(d) Facilitate communication about data trends and  treatment developments among
health care providers and  coordinated care organizations that provide services related to
stroke, cardiac, trauma, pediatric and behavioral health care; and
(e) Provide stroke, cardiac,  trauma, pediatric and behavioral health care data, and re-
commendations for improvement to care, to coordinated care organizations.
(2) Not later than the beginning of each odd-numbered  year regular session of the Leg-
islative Assembly, the program shall  submit to the Legislative Assembly a report in the
manner provided in ORS 192.245 summarizing the program’s activities under this section.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Emergency Medical  Services Advisory Board is established within
the Oregon Health Authority. The authority  shall provide staffing for the board. The board
consists of 19  members appointed by the Director of the Oregon Health Authority. Of the
members of the board:
(a) The State  EMS Medical Director of the Emergency Medical Services Program is an
ex officio member and serves as the chairperson;
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 2
(b) One must be a patient advocate or an education  professional who specializes in health
equity;
(c) One must be an emergency  medical services provider licensed under ORS 682.216 who
represents a private emergency medical services agency licensed under ORS 682.047;
(d) One must be an  emergency medical services provider licensed under ORS 682.216 who
represents a public emergency medical services agency licensed under ORS 682.047;
(e) One must be a representative of a nontransport emergency medical services agency;
(f) One must be a representative of a labor union that represents emergency medical
services providers;
(g) One must be an  emergency medical services provider licensed under ORS 682.216 who
works for an emergency medical services agency licensed under  ORS 682.047 within a rural
emergency medical services system or a rural hospital as defined in ORS 442.470;
(h) One must be a representative of county ambulance service area administrators;
(i) One must be a representative of special districts that operate ambulances;
(j) One must be a hospital administrator in a hospital that operates  an emergency de-
partment;
(k) One must be a nurse who works in a hospital emergency department;
(L) One must be a representative of  a public safety answering point, as defined in ORS
403.105;
(m) One must be an emergency medicine physician;
(n) One must be a person  who works in a long term care facility, as defined in ORS
442.015, or who represents long term  care facilities, or who works in a residential facility,
as defined in ORS 443.400, or who represents residential facilities;
(o) One must be a public member who is, or has been, a frequent user of  emergency
medical services;
(p) One must be a representative of a third-party payer of health care insurance;
(q) One must be a representative of a patient health care advocacy group;
(r) One must be a representative of a rural hospital, or a hospital  system that includes
a rural hospital, as defined in ORS 442.470; and
(s) One must be an emergency medical services physician.
(2)(a) The  physician members of the board must be physicians licensed under ORS chap-
ter 677 who are in good standing.
(b) The member described in subsection (1)(k) of  this section must be licensed under ORS
678.010 to 678.410 and in good standing.
(c) The members of the board who  represent emergency medical services agencies must
hold valid licenses in good standing.
(d) The members of the board who are emergency medical services providers must  hold
valid licenses in good standing.
(3) Board membership  must reflect the geographical, cultural, linguistic and economic
diversity of this state and must include at least one  representative from each emergency
medical services region designated under section 11 of this 2024 Act.
(4) The term of each member of the board is four years, but a  member serves at the
pleasure of the Director of the  Oregon Health Authority. Before the expiration of a term of
a member, the director shall appoint a successor whose term begins on January 1 next fol-
lowing. A member is eligible for reappointment for no more than two consecutive terms. If
there is a vacancy for  any cause, the director shall make an appointment to become imme-
diately effective for the unexpired term.
(5) A member of the board is entitled to compensation and expenses as provided under
ORS 292.495.
(6) The board may adopt rules as necessary to carry out its duties under sections 2  to
16 of this 2024 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 3
SECTION 5. (1) The Emergency Medical Services  Advisory Board shall provide advice and
recommendations to the Emergency Medical Services Program on the following:
(a) A definition of “patient” for purposes of time-sensitive  medical emergencies, pediatric
medical emergencies and behavioral health medical emergencies;
(b) Evidence-based practices and standards for emergency  medical services care for de-
fined patient types;
(c) Emergency medical services workforce needs;
(d) Coordination of care between health care specialties;
(e) Other issues related to emergency medical services as  determined by the Oregon
Health Authority and the program;
(f) The appointment of the regional emergency medical services advisory boards; and
(g) Approval of the regional emergency medical services plans described  in section 11 of
this 2024 Act.
(2) The board may convene temporary subcommittees for matters related to emergency
medical services in order to inform and make recommendations to the board.
(3) In addition to the duties described in subsection  (1) of this section, the board shall
convene the following permanent advisory committees that shall inform and  make recom-
mendations to the board, in addition to other specified duties:
(a) Time-Sensitive Medical  Emergencies Advisory Committee, as described in section 6
of this 2024 Act;
(b) Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee,  as described in section 7 of this
2024 Act;
(c) Pediatric Emergency Medical Services Advisory  Committee, as described in section 8
of this 2024 Act; and
(d) Behavioral Health Emergency Medical Services Advisory  Committee, as described in
section 9 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Time-Sensitive Medical  Emergencies Advisory Committee is estab-
lished in the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board. The committee  shall consist of
members determined by  the board and the Oregon Health Authority and must include at
least:
(a) One member who is a physician who practices  general surgery and specializes in the
treatment of trauma patients;
(b) One member who is a physician who practices neurology and  specializes in the
treatment of stroke patients;
(c) One member who is a physician who practices  cardiology and manages acute cardiac
conditions;
(d) One member who is a physician who practices critical care medicine;
(e) One member who is a physician who practices emergency medicine;
(f) One member who is a physician who practices emergency medical services medicine;
(g) One member who is  a physician who practices in neurological surgery and
neurocritical care and manages both trauma and stroke patients;
(h) One member who  is an emergency medical services provider licensed under ORS
682.216; and
(i) One member who represents a patient equity organization or  is an academic profes-
sional specializing in health equity.
(2)(a) The committee shall provide advice and recommendations to the  board regarding
systems of care related to time-sensitive  medical emergencies, including at least cardiac,
stroke, airway,  sepsis and trauma emergencies. The commission shall also consider other
time-sensitive emergencies  including but not limited to sepsis, infectious diseases,
pandemics, active seizures and severe respiratory emergencies.
(b) The committee shall provide recommendations to the board on:
(A) The regionalization and improvement  of care for time-sensitive medical emergencies.
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 4
(B) The designation, using nationally recognized classifications  where possible, of emer-
gency medical services centers  for the provision of care for time-sensitive medical emer-
gencies. If no nationally recognized classifications exist, the committee  shall undertake a
public deliberation process to establish  classifications and submit the established classifica-
tions to the board  for approval. In establishing and approving classifications, the committee
and the board shall prioritize patient care.
(3) The committee shall:
(a) Advise the  board with respect to the board’s duties related to care for cardiac, stroke,
trauma and other identified time-sensitive emergencies;
(b) Advise the board  on potential rules that the board may recommend to the authority
for adoption related to care  for cardiac, stroke, trauma and other identified time-sensitive
emergencies;
(c) Analyze data related to care for cardiac, stroke, trauma and other identified  time-
sensitive emergencies;
(d) Recommend to the board improvements to the Emergency Medical Services  Program
regarding care for cardiac, stroke, trauma and other identified time-sensitive emergencies;
and
(e) Identify inequities in  the provision of care and provide recommendations to the board
and program to resolve the identified inequities.
(4) The members of the committee who are physicians must be physicians licensed under
ORS chapter 677.
(5) The authority may adopt rules as necessary to carry out this  section, including rules
to adopt the nationally recognized classifications described in subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 7.
(1) The  Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee is established in
the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board. The committee  shall consist of members
determined by the board and the Oregon Health Authority and must include at least:
(a) One member who is a physician licensed under ORS chapter 677 who practices emer-
gency medicine or emergency medical services medicine;
(b) One  member who is an emergency medical services provider licensed under ORS
682.216; and
(c) One member  who represents a patient equity organization or is an academic profes-
sional specializing in health equity.
(2) The committee shall provide advice and recommendations to the board regarding
emergency medical services, for  the care of time-sensitive medical emergencies, pediatric
medical emergencies and behavioral health medical emergencies, including the following ob-
jectives:
(a) The regionalization and improvement of emergency medical services, including the
coordination and planning of emergency medical services efforts.
(b) The designation, using nationally recognized classifications where possible, of emer-
gency medical services centers for the  provision of care for medical emergencies. If no na-
tionally recognized classifications exist, the committee shall undertake a public deliberation
process to establish classifications and submit the established classifications  to the board for
approval. In establishing and approving classifications, the committee and the  board shall
prioritize patient care.
(c) The adoption of rules related to emergency medical services.
(3) The chairperson of the committee shall appoint an advisory subcommittee on the
licensure and discipline of emergency medical services  providers. The subcommittee shall
advise the board on potential rules that the board may recommend  to the authority for
adoption under this section.
(4) The committee may:
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 5
(a) Assist the Time-Sensitive Medical Emergencies Advisory Committee,  the Pediatric
Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee and the  Behavioral Health Emergency
Medical Services Advisory Committee in coordination and planning efforts; and
(b) Provide other assistance to the board as the board requests.
(5) The authority may adopt rules as necessary to carry out this  section, including rules
to adopt the nationally recognized classifications described in subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 8.
(1) The  Pediatric Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee is es-
tablished in  the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board. The committee shall consist
of members determined by the board and the Oregon Health Authority and  must include at
least:
(a) Two members who are physicians specializing in the treatment of pediatric emergency
patients;
(b) One member who is a nurse who has pediatric emergency experience;
(c) One member who is a physician with pediatric training;
(d) One  member who is an emergency medical services provider licensed under ORS
682.216;
(e) One member who is a representative of the Emergency Medical Services Program;
(f) One member who  has experience as the project director of a statewide committee
related to emergency medical services for children;
(g) One member who has experience as the program manager of a statewide  committee
related to emergency medical services for children;
(h) One member who is a family representative; and
(i) One member who represents a patient equity organization or  is an academic profes-
sional specializing in health equity.
(2) The committee shall provide advice and recommendations to the board regarding
pediatric medical emergencies, including the following objectives:
(a) The integration of pediatric emergency  medical services into the Emergency Medical
Services Program;
(b) The regionalization  and improvement of care for time-sensitive pediatric medical
emergencies; and
(c) The  designation, using nationally recognized classifications where possible, of emer-
gency medical services centers for the provision of  care for time-sensitive pediatric medical
emergencies.
(3) With the advice of  the Pediatric Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee,
the authority shall:
(a) Employ or contract with professional, technical,  research and clerical staff to ad-
minister a statewide program related to emergency medical services for children.
(b) Provide technical assistance to the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee
on the integration of pediatric emergency medical services into the Emergency Medical
Services Program.
(c) Provide technical assistance to the Time-Sensitive  Medical Emergencies Advisory
Committee on the regionalization of pediatric emergency medical services.
(d) Establish guidelines for:
(A) The voluntary categorization of emergency  medical services agencies and hospital
departments that meet the requirements of the United  States Health Resources and Services
Administration program for pediatric readiness, as adopted by the authority by rule.
(B) Referring pediatric patients to appropriate  emergency medical services centers or
critical care centers.
(C) Necessary pediatric patient care equipment for  prehospital and pediatric critical care.
(D) Developing a coordinated system that  will allow pediatric patients to receive appro-
priate initial stabilization and  treatment with timely provision of, or referral to, the appro-
priate level of care including critical care, trauma care and pediatric subspecialty care.
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 6
(E) An interfacility transfer system for critically ill or injured pediatric patients.
(F) Continuing education programs for emergency  medical services personnel, including
training in  the emergency care of pediatric patients across different demographics and
physical demonstrations of pediatric-specific patient care equipment.
(G) A public  education program promoting pediatric emergency medical services, includ-
ing information on emergency and crisis telephone numbers.
(H) The collection  and analysis of statewide pediatric prehospital, critical care and
trauma care data from prehospital, critical care and trauma care facilities  for the purpose
of quality improvement, subject to relevant confidentiality requirements.
(I) The establishment of cooperative interstate  relationships to facilitate the provision
of appropriate care for pediatric patients who must cross state borders to receive critical
care and trauma care services.
(J) Coordination and cooperation between a statewide program for emergency medical
services for children and other public and private organizations interested  or involved in
pediatric prehospital and critical care.
(4)(a) The members of the committee who are physicians must be  physicians licensed
under ORS chapter 677 and in good standing.
(b) The member of the committee who is a nurse must be licensed under ORS 678.010 to
678.410 and in good standing.
(5) The authority may adopt rules as necessary to carry out this  section, including rules
to adopt the nationally recognized classifications described in subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 9.
(1) The Behavioral Health Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee
is established in the Emergency  Medical Services Advisory Board. The committee shall con-
sist of  members determined by the board and the Oregon Health Authority and must include
at least:
(a) Two members who are physicians specializing in the  treatment of time-sensitive be-
havioral health medical emergencies;
(b) One member who is a physician who practices emergency medicine  or emergency
medical services medicine;
(c) One member who is an emergency medical services provider licensed under ORS
682.216; and
(d) One  member who represents a patient equity organization or is an academic profes-
sional specializing in health equity.
(2) The committee shall provide advice and recommendations to the board regarding
time-sensitive behavioral health medical emergencies, including the following objectives:
(a) The  integration of behavioral health emergency medical services into the Emergency
Medical Services Program.
(b) The regionalization and improvement of care  for time-sensitive behavioral health
medical emergencies.
(c) The  designation, using nationally recognized classifications where possible, of emer-
gency medical services centers for the provision of care for time-sensitive behavioral  health
medical emergencies. If no nationally recognized classifications exist, the  committee shall
undertake a public deliberation process to establish classifications and submit the established
classifications to the board for approval.  In establishing and approving classifications, the
committee and the board shall prioritize patient care.
(3) With the advice of the committee, the authority shall:
(a) Employ or contract with professional,  technical, research and clerical staff to imple-
ment this section.
(b) Provide technical assistance to the Emergency Medical Services Advisory  Committee
on the integration of emergency  medical services for behavioral health patients into the
Emergency Medical Services Program.
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 7
(c) Provide advice and technical assistance to the Time-Sensitive  Medical Emergencies
Advisory Committee on the regionalization of emergency medical services for behavioral
health patients.
(d) Establish guidelines for:
(A) The designation of specialized regional behavioral health critical care centers.
(B) Referring behavioral health patients  to appropriate emergency or critical care cen-
ters.
(C) Necessary prehospital  and other behavioral health emergency and critical care med-
ical service equipment.
(D) Developing a coordinated system to allow behavioral health patients to receive ap-
propriate initial stabilization and treatment with the timely provision of, or referral to, the
appropriate level of care, including critical care and behavioral health subspecialty care.
(E) An interfacility transfer system for critically ill or  injured behavioral health patients.
(F) Continuing professional education programs  for emergency medical services person-
nel, including training in the emergency care of behavioral health patients across different
demographics.
(G) A public education program concerning the emergency medical services for behav-
ioral health patients, including information on emergency access telephone numbers.
(H) The collection and analysis of statewide behavioral health emergency and  critical
care medical services data from emergency and critical  care medical services facilities for
the purpose of quality improvement  by those facilities, subject to relevant confidentiality
requirements.
(I) The establishment of cooperative interstate  relationships to facilitate the provision
of appropriate care for behavioral health patients who must cross state borders  to receive
emergency and critical care services.
(J) Coordination and cooperation between providers of emergency  medical services for
behavioral health patients and other public and private organizations interested or  involved
in emergency and critical care for behavioral health.
(4) The members of the committee who are physicians must be physicians licensed under
ORS chapter 677 who are in good standing.
(5) The authority may adopt rules as necessary to carry out this  section, including rules
to adopt the nationally recognized classifications described in subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 10.
(1)(a) The Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board, upon the advice of
the Time-Sensitive Medical Emergencies Advisory Committee,  the Emergency Medical Ser-
vices Advisory Committee, the Pediatric  Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee
and the Behavioral Health Emergency Medical Services Advisory  Committee, shall determine
the nationally recognized classification standards  to recommend to the Oregon Health Au-
thority to adopt as rules for categorization  and designation of emergency medical services
centers for the provision of trauma, stroke, cardiac,  pediatric and behavioral health care and
other identified time-sensitive emergencies.
(b) If a nationally recognized classification standard used  by the authority under this
subsection requires that  an emergency medical services center use a specific data system
or registry  in order to obtain a specific categorization or designation, the authority shall
require an emergency medical services center that intends to obtain  the categorization or
designation to adopt the data system or registry not later than:
(A) Eighteen months after the date on which the Emergency Medical Services  Advisory
Board and the authority determine the data system or registry must be  adopted, if the
emergency medical services center is  a large facility or hospital, with an additional six
months in which to demonstrate compliant usage of the data system or registry.
(B) Three years  after the date on which the board and the authority determine the data
system or registry must be adopted, if the emergency  medical services center is a critical
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 8
access or rural health  care facility or hospital, with an additional six months in which to
demonstrate compliant usage of the data system or registry.
(c) If no relevant nationally recognized  classification standard is available for a specific
type of emergency  medical services center, the authority shall consider the recommenda-
tions of the board for one or more new classifications of a type  of emergency medical ser-
vices center.
(d) The board and the authority may grant, at the request of an  emergency medical
services center, an extension to the timeline described in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(2)(a) An emergency medical services center is not required  to obtain categorization or
designation as described in subsection (1) of this  section but may, at the discretion of the
emergency medical services center, strive to obtain a specific categorization or designation.
(b) An emergency medical services center described in this subsection is not required to
adopt and use a specific data system or registry unless the data system  or registry is re-
quired in order to  obtain the categorization or designation that the emergency medical ser-
vices center strives to obtain.
(c) An emergency medical services center may concurrently adopt and use data systems
or registries in addition to any data systems or registries  required for a specific categori-
zation or designation.
(3) An emergency medical services center that uses any  data system or registry shall
grant to the authority permission  to extract data subject to relevant confidentiality re-
quirements.
(4) An emergency medical services center  may not hold itself out, or operate, as having
obtained a specific categorization or designation until:
(a) The emergency medical services  center meets all requirements for the categorization
or designation within the timelines specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section; and
(b) The authority, through the  Emergency Medical Services Program, recognizes that the
emergency medical services center meets the categorization or designation requirements.
(5) The  authority shall adopt rules to carry out this section and may adopt as rules of
the authority any relevant nationally recognized classification standards  and proposed clas-
sification standards described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 11. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall, with the advice of  the Emergency
Medical Services Advisory  Board, designate emergency medical services regions that are
consistent with local resources, geography, current patient  referral patterns and existing
regionalized health care structures  and networks. The authority and the Emergency Medical
Services Advisory Board  shall establish a regional emergency medical services advisory
board for each designated emergency medical services region. The authority and the Emer-
gency Medical  Services Advisory Board may determine the membership of each regional
emergency medical services advisory  board, and shall ensure that the membership reflects
the geographic, cultural, linguistic and economic diversity of the emergency  medical services
region.
(2) Each emergency medical services  region must include at least one hospital categor-
ized according  to the emergency medical services region’s emergency medical services ca-
pabilities as determined by standards adopted by the authority by rule.
(3) The authority, with the advice of the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board,
shall appoint the members  of the regional emergency medical services advisory boards.
Members serve at the pleasure of the  authority. Each regional emergency medical services
advisory board is responsible for:
(a) The development and maintenance of a regional  emergency medical services system
plan as described in subsection (4) of this section;
(b) Central medical direction for all field care and transportation consistent with  ge-
ographic and current communications capability; and
(c) Patient triage protocols for time-sensitive emergencies.
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 9
(4) Each regional emergency medical services system plan:
(a) Must include the following:
(A) A recommendation of  hospitals in the emergency medical services region to be des-
ignated by the authority as  emergency medical services centers under section 10 of this 2024
Act;
(B) A description of the patient  triage protocols to be used in the emergency medical
services region;
(C) A description  of the transportation of patients, including the transportation of pa-
tients who are members of a health maintenance organization, as defined in ORS 442.015;
(D) Information regarding  how the emergency medical services region will coordinate
with state and regional disaster preparedness efforts; and
(E) Any other information required by the authority by rule.
(b) Must be approved by the authority prior to implementation.
(c) May be revised with the approval of the authority.
(5) The authority  may, with the advice of the Emergency Medical Services Advisory
Board, implement the regional emergency medical services plans and may coordinate with  a
regional emergency medical services advisory board to make  changes desired by the au-
thority to the regional emergency medical services advisory board.
SECTION 12.
(1) The Emergency Medical Services Program, upon the recommendation
of the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board, shall establish  and maintain an emer-
gency medical services data system. In formulating recommendations, the board shall con-
sider the advice of the Time-Sensitive  Medical Emergencies Advisory Committee, the
Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee, the Pediatric Emergency Medical Services
Advisory Committee  and the Behavioral Health Emergency Medical Services Advisory Com-
mittee. The  Oregon Health Authority shall adopt rules for the data system described in this
subsection to establish:
(a) The information that must be reported to the data system;
(b) A process for the oversight of the data system and the reporting  of information to
the data system;
(c) The form and frequency of reporting information:
(A) To the data system, the authority and the board; and
(B) From the data system to health care facilities and providers that report  information
to the data system; and
(d) The procedures and standards for the administration and  maintenance of the data
system.
(2) In determining  the information described in subsection (1)(a) of this section, the au-
thority shall require the reporting of information recommended by the board  following con-
sultation with the committees.
(3) The data system established under this section must:
(a) Use nationally accredited data registry systems approved by the authority  where
available;
(b) Have security measures in place to protect individually identifiable information;
(c) Allow the authority to export data stored in the system;
(d) Be used  for quality assurance, quality improvement, epidemiological assessment and
investigation, public health implementation, critical response planning, prevention activities
and other purposes as the authority determines necessary; and
(e) Meet other requirements established by the authority by rule.
(4) If no relevant nationally accredited data registry system is available, the  authority
shall convene an advisory committee  of stakeholders, including but not limited to state and
community partners, to  develop a proposal for the establishment of a data system. The ad-
visory committee convened  under this subsection shall prioritize high-quality patient care
outcomes in all decision-making.
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 10
(5) The authority may not require:
(a) That a health care facility  adopt a specific registry unless that registry is required
for the specific categorization or designation that the health care facility seeks to obtain.
(b) The reporting of data that is not otherwise required of a health care  facility in order
for the health care facility to obtain a specific  categorization or designation that the health
care facility seeks to obtain.
(6) The authority may access and extract data  from any registry that a health care fa-
cility has adopted for purposes  of obtaining a specific categorization or designation, and may
use data described in this subsection in the data system established under this section.
(7) The Emergency Medical Services Program shall make recommendations to:
(a) Health care facilities for the adoption of specific registries and services  from the data
system established under this section for the purpose of health  care facility categorization;
and
(b) Emergency medical services providers for  the adoption of specific registries and ser-
vices from the data system established under this section for the purpose of  sharing emer-
gency medical services data with the authority.
(8) The authority may request the  inclusion of demographic data from patients who re-
ceive emergency medical care from a health care  facility or emergency medical services
provider, including but not limited to the patients’:
(a) Age;
(b) Sex;
(c) Gender;
(d) Race and ethnicity;
(e) Status as a disabled person;
(f) Status as a veteran; and
(g) Zip code and emergency medical services region of residence.
(9) As used in this section, “individually identifiable information” means:
(a) Individually identifiable health information as that term is defined in ORS 179.505; and
(b) Information that could be used to identify a health  care provider, emergency medical
services agency or health care facility.
SECTION 13.
The Emergency Medical  Services Program may create internal data sys-
tems in addition to the emergency medical  services data system established and maintained
under section 12 of this 2024 Act. The program may not require:
(1) An emergency medical  services center to adopt and use an internal data system cre-
ated under this section.
(2) Reporting of data that is not otherwise required of  an emergency medical services
center in order for  the emergency medical services center to obtain a specific categorization
or designation that the emergency medical services center seeks to obtain.
SECTION 14. (1) All findings and conclusions, interviews, reports, studies, communi-
cations and statements procured or provided by the Oregon Health  Authority, the Emer-
gency Medical  Services Advisory Board or a regional emergency medical services advisory
board in connection with obtaining data necessary to perform patient care quality assurance
functions are confidential pursuant to ORS 192.338, 192.345 and 192.355.
(2)(a) All data, including written reports, notes, records and  recommendations, received
or compiled by the Emergency Medical Services  Advisory Board or a regional emergency
medical services advisory board in conjunction with the authority’s duties under subsection
(1) of this section are confidential, privileged, nondiscoverable and inadmissible in any pro-
ceeding.
(b) A person serving on or  communicating with the Emergency Medical Services Advi-
sory Board or a regional medical services advisory board may not be:
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 11
(A) Examined as  to any communications with, or findings or recommendations of, the
Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board or regional  emergency medical services advi-
sory boards; or
(B) Subject to an action  for civil damages for actions taken or statements made in good
faith.
(3) Nothing in this section affects the admissibility of evidence of a party’s medical re-
cords dealing with the party’s medical care that  are not otherwise confidential or privileged.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2)(a) of this section, and except  as otherwise required,
all final reports by  the authority, the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board and the
regional emergency medical services advisory boards must be available to the  public. The
final reports may not contain any personally identifiable information.
(5) This section does not limit the discoverability or admissibility of any information  that
is available from any source other  than the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board or
a regional emergency medical services  advisory board in a judicial, administrative, arbi-
tration or mediation proceeding.
SECTION 15. (1) The Emergency Medical Services Program shall establish an  incentive
structure to encourage compliance with the classification  standards described in section 10
of this 2024 Act and  the regional emergency medical services system plans established under
section 11 of this 2024 Act. The structure must specify that:
(a)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B)  of this paragraph, any statewide grant or
program related to emergency medical services, including  any federal program related to
emergency medical services that is required to be administered by  a state agency, must be
administered by the Emergency Medical Services Program.
(B) A local emergency medical services program or other emergency medical  services
program that is not required to be administered by a state agency  is exempt from the re-
quirement described in this paragraph.
(b)(A) An emergency medical services region, as described in section 11 of this 2024 Act,
or other entity related to emergency medical services  must be in compliance with relevant
classification standards in order to receive grants  or participate in programs administered
by the Emergency Medical Services Program.
(B) An emergency medical services  region or entity that is not in compliance with the
classification standards may be subject to a corrective action plan developed by the  Emer-
gency Medical Services Program.
(2) An emergency medical services region  or entity that is not in compliance with rele-
vant classification standards may  apply to the Emergency Medical Services Program for
special consideration to receive grants and participate in programs administered  by the
Emergency Medical Services Program. Subject to the  availability of funding and other re-
sources and any requirements of the Emergency  Medical Services Program, an emergency
medical services region or entity described in this subsection may receive grants  or partic-
ipating in programming.
(3) The Emergency Medical  Services Program may enter into agreements with third
parties to administer any grants or programs on behalf of the  Emergency Medical Services
Program.
(4) Unless specifically requested by an agency or  entity, the Emergency Medical Services
Program may not interfere with the  attainment and administration of any federal emergency
medical services grants or programs operating in this state  that are required to be admin-
istered by specific entities or agencies.
(5) An entity that administers a  federal or state grant that is related to emergency
medical services, but that is not operated by or on behalf of the Emergency  Medical Services
Program, shall coordinate with the program for the purposes  of maintaining complete in-
formation on emergency medical services support throughout this state.
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 12
SECTION 16. (1) An emergency medical services provider may not be held liable  for act-
ing in accordance with approved emergency medical services plans.
(2) A person who in good faith provides information to an emergency  medical services
data system is immune from any civil or criminal liability  that might otherwise be incurred
or imposed with respect to provision of the information.
SECTION 17.  ORS 682.017 is amended to read:
682.017. The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt rules in accordance with ORS chapter  183
that include, but are not limited to:
(1) Requirements relating to  the types and numbers of emergency vehicles, including supplies
and equipment carried.
(2) Requirements for the  operation and coordination of ambulances and other emergency care
systems.
(3) Criteria for the use of two-way communications.
(4) Procedures for summoning and dispatching aid.
(5) Requirements that ambulance services report patient encounter data  to [ an electronic emer-
gency medical services data system managed by the authority ] the emergency medical services data
system established under section 12 of this 2024 Act . The requirements must specify the data
that an ambulance service must report, the form and frequency of  the reporting and the procedures
and standards for the administration of the data system.
(6) Levels of licensure for emergency medical services  providers. The lowest level of emergency
medical services provider licensure must be an emergency medical responder license.
(7) Other rules as necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 682.051 is amended to read:
682.051. (1) A person or governmental unit commits  the offense of unlawful operation of an un-
licensed ambulance or the offense of unlawful  operation of an unlicensed ambulance service if the
person or governmental unit advertises or  operates in this state a motor vehicle, aircraft or
watercraft ambulance that:
(a) Is not operated by an ambulance service licensed under this chapter;
(b) Is not licensed under this chapter; and
(c) Does  not meet the minimum requirements established under this chapter by the Oregon
Health Authority in consultation with the [ State Emergency  Medical Service Committee ] Emergency
Medical Services Advisory Board  for that type of ambulance.
(2) This section does not apply to any ambulance or any person if  the ambulance or person is
exempted by ORS 682.035 or 682.079 from regulation by the authority.
(3) Authority of political subdivisions to regulate ambulance services or to  regulate or allow the
use of ambulances is limited under ORS 682.031.
(4) The offense  described in this section, unlawful operation of an unlicensed ambulance or am-
bulance service, is a Class A misdemeanor. Each day of continuing violation shall be considered a
separate offense.
(5) In addition to the penalties prescribed by subsection (4) of this section, the authority may
impose upon a licensed ambulance service a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 for each violation  of
this chapter and the rules adopted thereunder. Each  day of continuing violation shall be considered
a separate violation for purposes of this subsection.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 682.056 is amended to read:
682.056. (1)[(a)] Ambulance services shall report patient encounter  data to the [ electronic emer-
gency medical services data system managed by the Oregon Health Authority ] emergency medical
services data system established under section 12 of this  2024 Act  for each patient care event
in accordance with rules adopted by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 682.017.
[(b) The authority by rule shall specify the  patient encounter data elements to be transferred from
the electronic  emergency medical services data system to the Oregon Trauma Registry and shall es-
tablish the procedures for the electronic transfer of the patient encounter data. ]
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 13
(2)(a) The patient outcome data described in subsection (3) of this section about a patient  who
an ambulance service transported to a hospital, and that the hospital entered into the  [ Oregon
Trauma Registry ] emergency medical services data system established under section 12  of this
2024 Act, must be available to the  designated official of the ambulance service that transported the
patient.
(b) The  authority by rule shall specify the method by which the patient outcome data will be
made available to the designated official of an ambulance service.
(3) Patient outcome data includes:
(a) The health outcomes of  the patient who was the subject of the prehospital care event from
the emergency department or other intake facility of the hospital, including but not limited to:
(A) Whether the patient was admitted to the hospital; and
(B) If the patient was admitted, to what unit the patient was assigned;
(b) The patient’s chief complaint, the diagnosis the patient  received in the emergency depart-
ment or other intake facility and any procedures performed on the patient;
(c) The emergency department or hospital discharge disposition of the patient; and
(d) Demographic or standard health care information as required by the authority by rule.
(4) Data provided pursuant to this section shall be:
(a) Treated as a confidential medical record and not disclosed; and
(b) Considered privileged data under ORS 41.675 and 41.685.
(5) Data provided pursuant to this section may be used for quality assurance,  quality improve-
ment, epidemiological assessment and investigation, public health critical response planning,  pre-
vention activities and other purposes that the authority determines necessary.
(6)(a) A nontransporting prehospital care provider may report patient  encounter data to the
electronic emergency medical services data system.
(b) A nontransporting  prehospital care provider that reports patient encounter data shall comply
with the reporting requirements that apply to ambulance services.
(c) The patient outcome data described  in subsection (3) of this section must be available to the
designated official of the nontransporting prehospital care  provider that provided care and reported
patient encounter data about the patient.
(7) The authority may adopt rules to carry out this section, including rules to:
(a) Establish software interoperability standards and guidance to assist in reporting the  patient
encounter data required by this section;
(b) Specify the method  by which the patient outcome data will be made available to
nontransporting prehospital care providers; and
(c) Define “nontransporting prehospital care provider.”
SECTION 20.
 ORS 682.059 is amended to read:
682.059. (1) The Oregon  Health Authority shall make publicly available on a website operated
by or on behalf of the authority an annual report of the data collected by the authority  under ORS
682.056.
(2) The authority shall consult with the [ State Emergency Medical Service Committee ] Emer-
gency Medical Services Advisory Board  to determine the  data to include in the report required
under this section.
(3) The report required under this section  may not contain individually identifiable health in-
formation, as defined in ORS 192.556, or  other information protected from public disclosure by state
or federal law.
SECTION 21.  ORS 682.068 is amended to read:
682.068. (1) The Oregon Health Authority, in consultation  with the [ State Emergency Medical
Service Committee ] Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board , shall adopt rules specifying
minimum requirements for ambulance services, and for staffing and medical  and communications
equipment requirements for  all types of ambulances. The rules must define the requirements for
advanced  life  support and basic life support units of emergency vehicles, including equipment and
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 14
emergency medical services provider staffing of the passenger compartment  when a patient is being
transported in emergency circumstances.
(2) The authority may waive any of the requirements imposed by this  chapter in medically dis-
advantaged areas as determined by the Director of the Oregon Health Authority, or upon  a showing
that a severe hardship would result from enforcing a particular requirement.
(3) The  authority shall exempt from rules adopted under this section air ambulances that do not
charge for the provision of ambulance services.
SECTION 22.  ORS 682.075 is amended to read:
682.075. (1) Subject to  any law or rule pursuant thereto relating to the construction or equip-
ment of  ambulances, the Oregon Health Authority shall, with the advice of the [ State Emergency
Medical Service Committee appointed under ORS 682.039 ] Emergency Medical Services Advisory
Board and  in accordance with ORS chapter 183, adopt and when necessary amend or repeal rules
relating to the construction, maintenance, capacity, sanitation, emergency medical  supplies and
equipment of ambulances.
(2) In order for an owner to secure and  retain a license for an ambulance under this chapter,
it shall meet the requirements imposed by rules of the authority. The requirements may  relate to
construction, maintenance, capacity, sanitation  and emergency medical supplies and equipment on
ambulances. Such requirements shall include, but are not limited to, requirements relating to  space
in patient compartments,  access to patient compartments, storage facilities, operating condition,
cots, mattresses, stretchers, cot and stretcher fasteners, bedding,  oxygen and resuscitation equip-
ment, splints,  tape, bandages, tourniquets, patient convenience accessories, cleanliness of vehicle
and laundering of bedding.
SECTION 23.  ORS 682.079 is amended to read:
682.079. (1)(a) The Oregon Health Authority  may grant exemptions or variances from one or
more of the requirements of ORS 820.330 to 820.380  or this chapter or the rules adopted under ORS
820.330 to 820.380 or this chapter to any class of  vehicles if the authority finds that compliance with
the requirement or requirements is inappropriate:
(A) Because  special circumstances exist that would render compliance unreasonable, burden-
some or impractical because of special conditions or cause; or
(B) Because compliance would result in  substantial curtailment of necessary ambulance service.
(b) Exemptions or  variances granted under this subsection may be limited in time or may be
conditioned as the authority considers necessary to protect the public welfare.
(2) In determining whether or not a variance shall be granted, the authority:
(a) May receive  the advice of the [ State Emergency Medical Service Committee ] Emergency
Medical Services Advisory Board ; and
(b) In all cases, shall weigh  the equities involved and the advantages and disadvantages to the
welfare of patients and the owners of vehicles.
(3) Rules under  this section shall be adopted, amended or repealed in accordance with ORS
183.330.
SECTION 24.
 ORS 181A.375 is amended to read:
181A.375. (1) The Board  on Public Safety Standards and Training shall establish the following
policy committees:
(a) Corrections Policy Committee;
(b) Fire Policy Committee;
(c) Police Policy Committee;
(d) Telecommunications Policy Committee; and
(e) Private Security Policy Committee.
(2) The members of each policy committee shall select a chairperson and  vice chairperson for
the policy committee. Only members of the policy committee who are also members of the board  are
eligible to serve as a chairperson or vice chairperson.  The vice chairperson may act as chairperson
in the absence of the chairperson.
(3) The Corrections Policy Committee consists of:
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 15
(a) All of the board members who represent the corrections discipline;
(b) The chief administrative officer of the training division of the Department of Corrections;
(c) A security manager from the Department of Corrections recommended by the  Director of the
Department of Corrections; and
(d) The following, who  may not be current board members, appointed by the chairperson of the
board:
(A) One person recommended by and representing the Oregon State Sheriffs’ Association;
(B) Two persons recommended by and representing the Oregon Sheriff’s Jail Command Council;
(C) One person recommended  by and representing a statewide association of community cor-
rections directors;
(D) One nonmanagement corrections officer employed by the Department of Corrections;
(E) One corrections officer who  is employed by the Department of Corrections at a women’s
correctional facility and who is a member of a bargaining unit;
(F) Two nonmanagement corrections officers; and
(G) One person representing the public who:
(i) Has never been employed or utilized as a corrections officer  or as a parole and probation
officer; and
(ii) Is not related within the second  degree by affinity or consanguinity to a person who is em-
ployed or utilized as a corrections officer or parole and probation officer.
(4) The Fire Policy Committee consists of:
(a) All of the board members who represent the fire service discipline; and
(b) The following, who may not be current board members, appointed by the  chairperson of the
board:
(A) One person recommended by and representing a statewide association of fire instructors;
(B) One person recommended by and representing a statewide association of fire marshals;
(C) One person recommended by and representing community college fire programs;
(D) One nonmanagement firefighter recommended by a statewide organization of firefighters;
(E) One person representing the forest protection agencies  and recommended by the State
Forestry Department; and
(F) One person representing the public who:
(i) Has never been employed or utilized as a fire service professional; and
(ii) Is not related within the second degree by affinity or consanguinity  to a person who is em-
ployed or utilized as a fire service professional.
(5) The Police Policy Committee consists of:
(a) All of the board members who represent the law enforcement discipline; and
(b) The following, who  may not be current board members, appointed by the chairperson of the
board:
(A) One person recommended by and representing the Oregon Association Chiefs of Police;
(B) Two persons recommended by and representing the Oregon State Sheriffs’ Association;
(C) One command officer recommended by and representing the Oregon State Police;
(D) Three nonmanagement law enforcement officers; and
(E) Two persons representing the public:
(i) Who have never been employed or utilized  as a police officer, certified reserve officer, re-
serve officer or regulatory specialist;
(ii) Who are not related within the  second degree by affinity or consanguinity to a person who
is employed or utilized  as a police officer, certified reserve officer, reserve officer or regulatory
specialist; and
(iii) One of whom is a member of a marginalized or historically underrepresented community.
(6) The Telecommunications Policy Committee consists of:
(a) All of the board members who represent the telecommunications discipline; and
(b) The following, who  may not be current board members, appointed by the chairperson of the
board:
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 16
(A) Two persons recommended by and representing a statewide  association of public safety
communications officers;
(B) One person recommended by and representing the Oregon Association Chiefs of Police;
(C) One person recommended by and representing the Oregon State Police;
(D) Two persons representing telecommunicators;
(E) One person recommended by and representing the Oregon State Sheriffs’ Association;
(F) One person recommended by and representing the Oregon Fire Chiefs Association;
(G) One person recommended by and representing the  [Emergency Medical Services and Trauma
Systems Program ] Emergency Medical Services Program  of the Oregon Health Authority;
(H) One person representing emergency medical services providers and recommended by  a
statewide association dealing with fire medical issues; and
(I) One person representing the public who:
(i) Has never been employed or utilized as a telecommunicator or an emergency medical dis-
patcher; and
(ii) Is not related within the second  degree by affinity or consanguinity to a person who is em-
ployed or utilized as a telecommunicator or an emergency medical dispatcher.
(7) The Private Security Policy Committee consists of:
(a) All of the board members who represent the private security industry; and
(b) The following, who may not be current board members, appointed by the  chairperson of the
board:
(A) One person representing unarmed private security professionals;
(B) One person representing armed private security professionals;
(C) One person representing the health care industry;
(D) One person representing the manufacturing industry;
(E) One person representing the retail industry;
(F) One person representing the hospitality industry;
(G) One person representing private business or a governmental entity that utilizes private  se-
curity services;
(H) One person representing persons who monitor alarm systems;
(I) Two persons who are investigators licensed under ORS  703.430, one of whom is recommended
by the Oregon State Bar and one of whom is in private practice; and
(J) One person representing the public who:
(i) Has never been employed or utilized as a private security provider, as defined  in ORS
181A.840, or an investigator, as defined in ORS 703.401; and
(ii) Is not related within the second  degree by affinity or consanguinity to a person who is em-
ployed or utilized as a private security provider, as defined in ORS 181A.840, or an investigator,  as
defined in ORS 703.401.
(8) In making appointments to  the policy committees under this section, the chairperson of the
board shall seek to reflect the diversity of the state’s population.  An appointment made by the
chairperson of the board must be ratified by the board before the appointment  is effective. The
chairperson of the board may remove an appointed member for  just cause. An appointment to a
policy committee that is based on the  member’s employment is automatically revoked if the member
changes employment. The chairperson of the board shall fill a vacancy in the same  manner as
making an initial appointment.  The term of an appointed member is two years. An appointed member
may be appointed to a second term.
(9) A  policy committee may meet at such times and places as determined by the policy commit-
tee in consultation with the Department  of Public Safety Standards and Training. A majority of a
policy committee constitutes a quorum to conduct business. A policy committee may  create sub-
committees if needed.
(10)(a) Each policy committee shall develop policies,  requirements, standards and rules relating
to its specific discipline. A policy committee shall submit  its policies, requirements, standards and
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 17
rules to the board for the board’s consideration. When a policy  committee submits a policy, re-
quirement, standard or rule to the board for the board’s consideration, the board shall:
(A) Approve the policy, requirement, standard or rule;
(B) Disapprove the policy, requirement, standard or rule; or
(C) Defer a decision and return the matter  to the policy committee for revision or reconsider-
ation.
(b) The board may defer a decision and return a matter submitted by a policy  committee under
paragraph (a) of this subsection only once. If a policy, requirement, standard or rule that was  re-
turned to a policy committee is resubmitted to  the board, the board shall take all actions necessary
to implement the  policy, requirement, standard or rule unless the board disapproves the policy, re-
quirement, standard or rule.
(c) Disapproval of a policy, requirement, standard or rule under paragraph (a) or (b) of  this
subsection requires a two-thirds vote by the members of the board.
(11) At any time after submitting a matter to the board, the chairperson of the  policy committee
may withdraw the matter from the board’s consideration.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 353.450 is amended to read:
353.450. (1) It is the finding of the Legislative Assembly that there is need to provide  programs
that will assist a  rural community to recruit and retain physicians, physician assistants and nurse
practitioners. For that purpose:
(a) The Legislative Assembly supports  the development at the Oregon Health and Science Uni-
versity of an Area Health Education Center program as provided for under the United  States Public
Health Service Act, Section 781.
(b) The university shall provide continuing education opportunities for persons licensed to
practice medicine under ORS chapter  677 who practice in rural areas of this state in cooperation
with the respective professional organizations, including the Oregon Medical Association and  the
Oregon Society of Physician Assistants.
(c) The university shall seek funding through grants and other  means to implement and operate
a fellowship program for physicians, physician assistants and nurse  practitioners intending to prac-
tice in rural areas.
(2) With the moneys transferred to the Area Health Education Center  program by ORS 442.870,
the program shall:
(a) Establish educational opportunities for emergency medical services  providers in rural coun-
ties;
(b) Contract with educational facilities qualified to conduct  emergency medical training pro-
grams using a curriculum approved by the [ Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Systems Pro-
gram] Emergency Medical Services Program ; and
(c) Review requests for training funds with input from the [ State Emergency Medical  Service
Committee] Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board  and other individuals  with expertise in
emergency medical services.
SECTION 26.  ORS 442.507 is amended to read:
442.507. (1) With the moneys transferred to the Office  of Rural Health by ORS 442.870, the office
shall establish a dedicated grant program  for the purpose of providing assistance to rural commu-
nities to enhance emergency medical service systems.
(2) Communities, as well as nonprofit or  governmental agencies serving those communities, may
apply to the office for grants on forms developed by the office.
(3) The office shall make the final decision concerning which entities receive grants, but  the
office may seek advice from  the Rural Health Coordinating Council, the [ State Emergency Medical
Service Committee ] Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board  and other appropriate individ-
uals experienced with emergency medical services.
(4) The office may make grants to entities for the purchase of equipment, the  establishment of
new rural emergency medical service systems or  the improvement of existing rural emergency
medical service systems.
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 18
(5) With the exception of printing and mailing expenses associated with the  grant program, the
Office of Rural Health shall pay for administrative costs of the program with funds other  than those
transferred under ORS 442.870.
SECTION 27.  ORS 442.870 is amended to read:
442.870. (1) The Emergency Medical Services Enhancement Account is established  separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the account shall accrue to  the ac-
count. All moneys deposited in the account are continuously appropriated  to the Department of
Revenue for the purposes of this section.
(2) The Department  of Revenue shall distribute moneys in the Emergency Medical Services En-
hancement Account in the following manner:
(a) 35 percent of the moneys in the account shall be transferred to the  Office of Rural Health
established under ORS 442.475 for the purpose of enhancing emergency medical services in rural
areas as specified in ORS 442.507.
(b) 25 percent of the moneys in the account shall be transferred to the  [ Emergency Medical
Services and Trauma Systems Program established under ORS 431A.085 ] Emergency Medical Ser-
vices Program established under section 2 of this 2024 Act .
(c) 35 percent of the moneys  in the account shall be transferred to the Area Health Education
Center program established under ORS 353.450.
(d) 5 percent of the moneys in the account shall be  transferred to the Oregon Poison Center
referred to in ORS 431A.313.
SECTION 28.
ORS 682.039 is repealed.
SECTION 29. (1) Sections 2 to 16 of this 2024 Act,  the amendments to ORS 181A.375,
353.450, 442.507, 442.870, 682.017, 682.051, 682.056,  682.059, 682.068, 682.075 and 682.079 by
sections 17 to 27 of this 2024 Act  and the repeal of ORS 682.039 by section 28 of this 2024 Act
become operative on January 1, 2025.
(2) The Board on Public Safety Standards and Training, the Department of Revenue,  the
Office of Rural Health, the Oregon Health Authority and the Oregon  Health and Science
University may take any action before the  operative date specified in subsection (1) of this
section that is necessary to enable the authority, board,  department, office and university
to exercise,  on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of
the duties, functions and powers conferred on the authority, board, department, office and
university by sections 2 to 16 of this 2024  Act, the amendments to ORS 181A.375, 353.450,
442.507, 442.870, 682.017, 682.051, 682.056, 682.059, 682.068, 682.075 and 682.079 by sections 17 to
27 of this 2024 Act and the repeal of ORS 682.039 by section 28 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 30.
(1) Notwithstanding the term of office specified in section 4 of this 2024 Act,
of the members first appointed  to the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board under
section 4 (1)(b) to (q) of this 2024 Act:
(a) Four shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2025.
(b) Four shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2026.
(c) Four shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2027.
(d) Four shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2028.
(2) The Director  of the Oregon Health Authority may appoint to the Emergency Medical
Services Advisory Board  members of the State Trauma Advisory Board established under
ORS 431A.055, the Stroke Care Committee established under ORS 431A.525  and the State
Emergency Medical Service Committee established under ORS 682.039 (2023 Edition) who
meet the membership requirements described in section 4 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 31.
The Director of the Oregon Health Authority may appoint to the:
(1) Time-Sensitive Medical Emergencies Advisory Committee members of  the State
Trauma Advisory Board established under ORS 431A.055 and the Stroke  Care Committee
established under ORS 431A.525.
(2) Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee  members of the State Emergency
Medical Service Committee established under ORS 682.039 (2023 Edition).
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 19
(3) The Pediatric Emergency Medical Services Advisory  Committee members of the
Emergency Medical Services  for Children Advisory Committee established under ORS
431A.105.
SECTION 32. (1) The Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board, the Time-Sensitive
Medical Emergencies Advisory Committee,  the Pediatric Emergency Medical Services Advi-
sory Committee and the Behavioral Health Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee
may hold their first meetings no earlier than January 1, 2025.
(2)(a) The emergency medical  services regions established under section 11 of this 2024
Act may hold their first meetings no earlier than January 1, 2026.
(b) The emergency medical services regions shall develop  the regional emergency medical
services system plans not later than January 1, 2027.
SECTION 33.
Not later than December 31  of each even-numbered year, the Oregon
Health Authority shall submit, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, a report to the  Leg-
islative Assembly  on the progress of implementing the provisions of sections 2 to 16 of this
2024 Act. The  report must include detailed information regarding any challenges in imple-
menting the provisions of sections 2 to 16 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 34. Section 33 of this 2024 Act is repealed on December 31, 2030.
EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES PROGRAM 2027
SECTION 35. Section 36 of this 2024 Act  is added to and made a part of sections 2 to 16
of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 36. (1) The Long Term Care and Senior  Care Emergency Medical Services Ad-
visory Committee is established in the Emergency Medical Services Advisory  Board. The
committee shall consist of members determined by the board and the Oregon  Health Au-
thority and must include at least:
(a) One member who is a physician licensed under ORS chapter 677 who practices emer-
gency medicine or emergency medical services medicine;
(b) One  member who is an emergency medical services provider licensed under ORS
682.216;
(c) One member  who represents a patient equity organization or is an academic profes-
sional specializing in health equity; and
(d) One member who is  a hospital administrator in a hospital that operates an emergency
department.
(2) The committee shall provide advice and recommendations to the board regarding
time-sensitive long term care and senior care medical emergencies on:
(a) The integration of long term care and  senior care emergency medical services into
the Emergency Medical Services Program.
(b) The regionalization and  improvement of care for time-sensitive long term care and
senior care medical emergencies.
(c) The  designation, using nationally recognized classifications where possible, of emer-
gency medical services centers for the provision of care for time-sensitive long term care
and senior  care medical emergencies. If no nationally recognized classifications exist, the
committee shall undertake a public deliberation process  to establish classifications and sub-
mit the established classifications to  the board for approval. In establishing and approving
classifications, the committee and the board shall prioritize patient care.
(3) With the advice of the Long Term Care and  Senior Care Emergency Medical Services
Advisory Committee, the authority shall:
(a) Employ or contract with professional, technical, research  and clerical staff to imple-
ment this subsection.
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 20
(b) Provide technical assistance to the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee
on the  integration of emergency medical services for long term and senior care patients into
the Emergency Medical Services Program.
(c) Provide advice  and technical assistance to the Time-Sensitive Medical Emergencies
Advisory Committee on the regionalization of emergency medical services for long  term care
and senior care patients.
(d) Establish guidelines for:
(A) The categorization of specialized regional critical care centers  and trauma care cen-
ters for long term care and senior care patients.
(B) Referring long term care and senior care  patients to appropriate emergency or crit-
ical care centers.
(C) Necessary prehospital and other emergency and critical care medical service equip-
ment for long term care and senior care patients.
(D) Developing a system that will allow long term care and senior care patients to receive
appropriate initial stabilization and treatment with the timely provision of, or referral to, the
appropriate level of care, including critical care, trauma care or subspecialty care.
(E) An interfacility transfer system for critically ill  or injured long term care and senior
care patients.
(F) Continuing professional education programs  for emergency medical services person-
nel, including training in the emergency care of  long term care and senior care patients
across different demographics.
(G) A public education program concerning emergency medical services for long term
care and senior care patients, including  information on emergency access telephone num-
bers.
(H) The collection  and analysis of statewide emergency and critical care medical services
data from emergency and critical care  medical services facilities for the purposes of quality
improvement by those facilities  with respect to long term care and senior care patients,
subject to relevant confidentiality requirements.
(I) The establishment of cooperative interstate  relationships to facilitate the provision
of appropriate care for  long term and senior care patients who must cross state borders to
receive emergency and critical care services.
(J) Coordination and cooperation between providers of emergency  medical services for
long term care and senior care  patients and other public and private organizations interested
or involved in emergency and critical care for long term care and senior care patients.
(4) The authority may adopt rules as necessary to carry out this  section, including rules
to adopt the nationally recognized classifications described in subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 37.
 Section 3 of this 2024 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 3. (1) The Emergency Medical Services Program, with the advice of the Emergency Medical
Services Advisory Board, the Time-Sensitive Medical Emergencies Advisory Committee,  the Emer-
gency Medical Services Advisory Committee, the Pediatric Emergency Medical Services  Advisory
Committee [ and], the Behavioral Health Emergency  Medical Services Advisory Committee  and the
Long Term Care and Senior Care Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee , shall:
(a) Coordinate with national health organizations  involved in improving the quality of stroke,
cardiac, trauma, pediatric [ and], behavioral health and long term and senior  care  to avoid
duplicative information and redundant processes;
(b) Use information related to stroke, cardiac, trauma, pediatric [ and], behavioral health and
long term and senior  care to support improvement in the quality of  care in accordance with
guidelines that meet or exceed nationally recognized standards;
(c) Encourage the sharing of information among health care providers on  practices that improve
the quality of stroke, cardiac,  trauma, pediatric [ and], behavioral health  and long term and senior
care;
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 21
(d) Facilitate communication about data trends and treatment developments  among health care
providers and coordinated care organizations that provide services related to  stroke, cardiac,
trauma, pediatric [ and], behavioral health and long term and senior  care; and
(e) Provide stroke,  cardiac, trauma, pediatric [ and], behavioral health and long term and sen-
ior care data, and recommendations for improvement to care, to coordinated care organizations.
(2) Not later  than the beginning of each odd-numbered year regular session of the Legislative
Assembly, the program shall submit to the Legislative Assembly  a report in the manner provided in
ORS 192.245 summarizing the program’s activities under this section.
SECTION 38.  Section 5 of this 2024 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  (1) The Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board shall provide  advice and recom-
mendations to the Emergency Medical Services Program on the following:
(a) A definition of “patient” for purposes  of time-sensitive medical emergencies, pediatric med-
ical emergencies [ and], behavioral health medical emergencies and long  term and senior care
medical emergencies;
(b) Evidence-based practices and standards for  emergency medical services care for defined pa-
tient types;
(c) Emergency medical services workforce needs;
(d) Coordination of care between health care specialties;
(e) Other issues  related to emergency medical services as determined by the Oregon Health
Authority and the program;
(f) The appointment of the regional emergency medical services advisory boards; and
(g) Approval of the regional emergency medical services  plans described in section 11 of this
2024 Act.
(2) The board may convene  temporary subcommittees for matters related to emergency medical
services in order to inform and make recommendations to the board.
(3) In addition to the duties described in subsection (1) of this  section, the board shall convene
the following permanent advisory committees  that shall inform and make recommendations to the
board, in addition to other specified duties:
(a) Time-Sensitive Medical Emergencies Advisory Committee, as described in section 6  of this
2024 Act;
(b) Emergency Medical Services  Advisory Committee, as described in section 7 of this 2024 Act;
(c) Pediatric Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee, as described  in section 8 of this
2024 Act; [ and]
(d) Behavioral Health Emergency Medical  Services Advisory Committee, as described in section
9 of this 2024 Act[ .]; and
(e) Long Term Care and Senior Care Emergency Medical Services  Advisory Committee,
as described in section 36 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 39.
 Section 7 of this 2024 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 7.  (1) The Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee is established  in the Emer-
gency Medical Services Advisory Board. The committee shall consist of  members determined by the
board and the Oregon Health Authority and must include at least:
(a) One member who is a physician licensed under ORS chapter  677 who practices emergency
medicine or emergency medical services medicine;
(b) One member who is an emergency  medical services provider licensed under ORS 682.216; and
(c) One member who represents a patient equity  organization or is an academic professional
specializing in health equity.
(2) The committee shall provide advice and recommendations to the  board regarding emergency
medical services, for the care of time-sensitive medical emergencies, pediatric medical  emergencies
[and], behavioral health medical emergencies and long term and senior care medical emergen-
cies, including the following objectives:
(a) The regionalization and improvement of emergency medical services, including  the coordi-
nation and planning of emergency medical services efforts.
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 22
(b) The designation, using  nationally recognized classifications where possible, of emergency
medical services centers for the provision of care for medical  emergencies. If no nationally recog-
nized classifications exist, the committee shall undertake a public deliberation process to establish
classifications and submit the established classifications to the board for approval. In  establishing
and approving classifications, the committee and the board shall prioritize patient care.
(c) The adoption of rules related to emergency medical services.
(3) The chairperson of the committee shall appoint  an advisory subcommittee on the licensure
and discipline of emergency  medical services providers. The subcommittee shall advise the board on
potential rules that the board may recommend to the authority for adoption under this section.
(4) The committee may:
(a) Assist the Time-Sensitive Medical Emergencies Advisory Committee, the Pediatric  Emer-
gency  Medical  Services Advisory Committee [ and], the Behavioral Health Emergency Medical Ser-
vices  Advisory  Committee and the Long Term Care and Senior Care Emergency Medical
Services Advisory Committee  in coordination and planning efforts; and
(b) Provide other assistance to the board as the board requests.
(5) The authority may adopt rules as necessary to carry out this section, including rules to
adopt the nationally recognized classifications described in subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 40.
 Section 10 of this 2024 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 10.  (1)(a) The Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board, upon the  advice of the Time-
Sensitive Medical  Emergencies Advisory Committee, the Emergency Medical Services Advisory
Committee, the Pediatric  Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee [ and], the Behavioral
Health Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee and the Long Term Care and Senior
Care Emergency Medical Services Advisory  Committee , shall determine the nationally recog-
nized classification standards to recommend to the Oregon Health Authority to  adopt as rules for
categorization  and  designation of emergency medical services centers for the provision of trauma,
stroke, cardiac, pediatric [ and], behavioral health and long term and senior  care and other iden-
tified time-sensitive emergencies.
(b) If a nationally recognized classification standard used by the authority under this subsection
requires that an emergency medical services  center use a specific data system or registry in order
to obtain a specific categorization or designation, the authority shall  require an emergency medical
services center that intends to obtain the categorization or designation  to adopt the data system or
registry not later than:
(A) Eighteen  months after the date on which the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board
and the authority determine the data system or registry must be adopted, if the emergency medical
services center is a large facility or hospital, with an additional six months in  which to demonstrate
compliant usage of the data system or registry.
(B) Three years after the date on which the board and the authority  determine the data system
or registry must be adopted, if the emergency medical services center is a critical  access or rural
health care facility or hospital, with an additional  six months in which to demonstrate compliant
usage of the data system or registry.
(c) If no relevant nationally  recognized classification standard is available for a specific type
of emergency  medical services center, the authority shall consider the recommendations of the board
for one or more new classifications of a type of emergency medical services center.
(d) The board and the authority may grant, at the request of an emergency medical services
center, an extension to the timeline described in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(2)(a) An emergency medical services center is not required to obtain categorization or  desig-
nation as described  in subsection (1) of this section but may, at the discretion of the emergency
medical services center, strive to obtain a specific categorization or designation.
(b) An emergency medical services  center described in this subsection is not required to adopt
and use a specific data system or registry unless the data system or registry is required  in order
to obtain the categorization or designation  that the emergency medical services center strives to
obtain.
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 23
(c) An  emergency medical services center may concurrently adopt and use data systems or
registries in addition to any data systems or  registries required for a specific categorization or
designation.
(3) An  emergency medical services center that uses any data system or registry shall grant to
the authority permission to extract data subject to relevant confidentiality requirements.
(4) An emergency medical services center may  not hold itself out, or operate, as having obtained
a specific categorization or designation until:
(a) The emergency medical services center meets all requirements for the categorization  or
designation within the timelines specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section; and
(b) The authority,  through the Emergency Medical Services Program, recognizes that the emer-
gency medical services center meets the categorization or designation requirements.
(5) The  authority shall adopt rules to carry out this section and may adopt as rules of the au-
thority any relevant nationally recognized classification  standards and proposed classification
standards described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 41.  ORS 146.015 is amended to read:
146.015. (1) There is hereby established the State Medical Examiner Advisory Board.
(2) The board shall make policies  for the administration of ORS 146.003 to 146.189 and the De-
partment of State Police shall adopt rules to effectuate the policies.
(3) The board shall recommend the name  or names of pathologists to the Superintendent of State
Police from which the superintendent shall appoint the Chief Medical Examiner.
(4) The board consists of 11 members appointed by the Governor who are:
(a) The Chair of the Department of  Pathology of the Oregon Health and Science University, who
is the chairperson of the board;
(b) The State Health Officer;
(c) A sheriff;
(d) A trauma physician recommended by the [ State Trauma Advisory  Board ] Emergency Med-
ical Services Advisory Board ;
(e) A pathologist;
(f) A district attorney;
(g) A funeral service practitioner and embalmer licensed by the  State Mortuary and Cemetery
Board;
(h) A chief of police;
(i) A member of the defense bar;
(j) A member of the public at large; and
(k) A member of one of the federally recognized Oregon Indian tribes.
(5) The members described in subsection (4)(a) and (b) of this section  may serve as long as they
hold their respective positions. The term  of office of each member described in subsection (4)(c), (f)
and (h) of this section is  for four years, except that the position becomes vacant if the member
ceases to be a sheriff,  district attorney or chief of police, respectively. The terms of office of the
other members of the State Medical Examiner Advisory Board are for four years.
(6) A member of the board is entitled to compensation and expenses as provided in  ORS 292.495.
(7) The board shall meet annually at a time and place determined by the chairperson.  The
chairperson or any four members of the board may call a special meeting upon not less than  one
week’s notice to the members of the board.
(8) Six members of the board constitute a quorum.
SECTION 42.
 ORS 441.020 is amended to read:
441.020. (1) Licenses for health care facilities, except long term care facilities as defined in ORS
442.015, must be obtained from the Oregon Health Authority.
(2) Licenses for long term care  facilities must be obtained from the Department of Human Ser-
vices.
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 24
(3) Applications shall be upon such forms and shall contain such information as  the authority
or the department may reasonably require, which may include  affirmative evidence of ability to
comply with such reasonable standards and rules as may lawfully be  prescribed under ORS 441.025.
(4)(a) Each application submitted to the Oregon Health Authority must be accompanied by the
license fee. If the license  is denied, the fee shall be refunded to the applicant. If the license is issued,
the fee shall be paid into the State Treasury to the  credit of the Oregon Health Authority Fund for
the purpose of carrying out the functions of the Oregon Health  Authority under and enforcing ORS
441.015 to 441.119, 441.761 to 441.795 and 441.993; or
(b) Each application submitted to the Department of  Human Services must be accompanied by
the application fee or the annual renewal fee, as applicable. If the license is denied, the  fee shall
be refunded to the applicant. If the license is issued, the fee shall be paid into the  State Treasury
to the credit of the  Department of Human Services Account for the purpose of carrying out the
functions of the Department of  Human Services under and enforcing ORS [ 431A.050 to 431A.080, ]
441.015 to 441.119 and 441.993.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (8) of this section, for hospitals with:
(a) Fewer than 26 beds, the annual license fee shall be $1,250.
(b) Twenty-six beds or more but fewer than 50 beds, the annual license fee shall be $1,850.
(c) Fifty or more beds but fewer than 100 beds, the annual license fee shall be $3,800.
(d) One hundred beds or more but fewer than 200 beds, the annual license fee shall be $6,525.
(e) Two hundred or more beds, but fewer than 500 beds, the annual license fee shall be $8,500.
(f) Five hundred or more beds, the annual license fee shall be $12,070.
(6) A hospital shall pay an annual fee of $750 for  each hospital satellite indorsed under the
hospital’s license.
(7) The authority may charge a reduced hospital fee or hospital satellite fee if  the authority
determines that charging the standard fee constitutes a significant financial burden to the facility.
(8) For long term care facilities with:
(a) One to 15  beds, the application fee shall be $2,000 and the annual renewal fee shall be $1,000.
(b) Sixteen to 49 beds, the application fee shall be $3,000  and the annual renewal fee shall be
$1,500.
(c) Fifty to  99 beds, the application fee shall be $4,000 and the annual renewal fee shall be
$2,000.
(d) One hundred to 150 beds, the application fee shall  be $5,000 and the annual renewal fee shall
be $2,500.
(e) More than 150 beds, the application  fee shall be $6,000 and the annual renewal fee shall be
$3,000.
(9) For ambulatory surgical centers, the annual license fee shall be:
(a) $1,750 for certified and  high complexity noncertified ambulatory surgical centers with more
than two procedure rooms.
(b) $1,250 for certified and high complexity noncertified ambulatory surgical  centers with no
more than two procedure rooms.
(c) $1,000 for moderate complexity noncertified ambulatory surgical centers.
(10) For birthing centers, the annual license fee shall be $750.
(11) For outpatient renal dialysis facilities, the annual license fee shall be $2,000.
(12) The authority shall prescribe by rule the fee for licensing an extended stay center, not to
exceed:
(a) An application fee of $25,000; and
(b) An annual renewal fee of $5,000.
(13) During the time the licenses remain  in force, holders are not required to pay inspection fees
to any county, city or other municipality.
(14) Any health care facility license may be indorsed to permit operation at more than one lo-
cation. If so, the applicable license fee shall be the sum  of the license fees that would be applicable
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 25
if each location were separately licensed. The authority may  include hospital satellites on a
hospital’s license in accordance with rules adopted by the authority.
(15) Licenses for health  maintenance organizations shall be obtained from the Director of the
Department of Consumer and Business Services pursuant to ORS 731.072.
(16) Notwithstanding subsection (4) of this section, all moneys received for approved applications
pursuant to subsection (8) of this section shall  be deposited in the Quality Care Fund established in
ORS 443.001.
(17) As used in this section:
(a) “Hospital satellite” has the meaning prescribed by the authority by rule.
(b) “Procedure room” means a room where surgery or invasive procedures are performed.
SECTION 43.
ORS 431A.050, 431A.055, 431A.060, 431A.065, 431A.070, 431A.075, 431A.080,
431A.085, 431A.090, 431A.095, 431A.100, 431A.105, 431A.525 and 431A.530 are repealed.
SECTION 44. (1) Section 36 of this 2024 Act, the amendments to sections  3, 5, 7 and 10
of this 2024 Act by sections 37 to 40 of this 2024 Act, the  amendments to ORS 146.015 and
441.020 by sections 41 and 42 of this  2024 Act and the repeal of ORS 431A.050, 431A.055,
431A.060, 431A.065, 431A.070, 431A.075, 431A.080, 431A.085, 431A.090,  431A.095, 431A.100,
431A.105, 431A.525 and 431A.530 by section  43 of this 2024 Act become operative on January
1, 2027.
(2) The Department of Human Services, the Oregon  Health Authority and the State
Medical Examiner Advisory Board may take any action before  the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the authority, board and  depart-
ment to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section,
all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the authority, board and department by
section 36 of  this 2024 Act, the amendments to sections 3, 5, 7 and 10 of this 2024 Act by
sections 37 to 40 of this 2024 Act, the amendments to ORS 146.015 and 441.020 by  sections 41
and 42 of this 2024 Act and the repeal of  ORS 431A.050, 431A.055, 431A.060, 431A.065, 431A.070,
431A.075, 431A.080, 431A.085, 431A.090, 431A.095, 431A.100, 431A.105, 431A.525 and  431A.530 by
section 43 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 45.
The Director of the Oregon Health Authority may appoint to  the Long
Term Care and  Senior Care Emergency Medical Services Advisory Committee members of
the Senior Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council established under section 1,  chap-
ter 616, Oregon Laws 2021.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 46. The unit captions used in this 2024 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 47. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 26
Passed by House March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4081 (HB 4081-A) Page 27